California statutes. Penal Code
 campus, public place, place of worship, cemetery, or place of employment for the purpose of terrorizing a person who attends, works at, or is otherwise associated with the school, college campus, public place, place of worship, cemetery, or place of employment shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months or two or three years, by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment for the first conviction.

(e) A second or subsequent conviction pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months or two or three years, by a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(f) As used in this section, “terrorize” means to cause a person of ordinary emotions and sensibilities to fear for personal safety.

(g) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 397, Sec. 1.   (AB 2282)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11412.

Any person who, with intent to cause, attempts to cause or causes another to refrain from exercising his or her religion or from engaging in a religious service by means of a threat, directly communicated to such person, to inflict an unlawful injury upon any person or property, and it reasonably appears to the recipient of the threat that such threat could be carried out is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1119, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11413.

(a) Any person who explodes, ignites, or attempts to explode or ignite any destructive device or any explosive, or who commits arson, in or about any of the places listed in subdivision (b), for the purpose of terrorizing another or in reckless disregard of terrorizing another is guilty of a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for three, five, or seven years, and a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to the following places:

(1) Any health facility licensed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or any place
 where medical care is provided by a licensed health care professional.

(2) Any church, temple, synagogue, mosque, or other place of worship.

(3) The buildings, offices, and meeting sites of organizations that counsel for or against abortion or among whose major activities are lobbying, publicizing, or organizing with respect to public or private issues relating to abortion.

(4) Any place at which a lecture, film-showing, or other private meeting or presentation that educates or propagates with respect to abortion practices or policies, whether on private property or at a meeting site authorized for specific use by a private group on public property, is taking place.

(5) Any bookstore or public or private library.

(6) Any building or facility designated as a courthouse.

(7) The home or office of a judicial officer.

(8) Any building or facility regularly occupied by county probation department personnel in which the employees perform official duties of the probation department.

(9) Any private property, if the property was targeted in whole or in part because of any of the actual or perceived characteristics of the owner or occupant of the property listed in subdivision (a) of Section 422.55.

(10) Any public or private school providing instruction in kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(c) As used in this section, “judicial officer”
 means a magistrate, judge, justice, commissioner, referee, or any person appointed by a court to serve in one of these capacities, of any state or federal court located in this state.

(d) As used in this section, “terrorizing” means to cause a person of ordinary emotions and sensibilities to fear for personal safety.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the prosecution of any person pursuant to Section 18740 or any other provision of law in lieu of prosecution pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 498.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.    Amended version operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

11414.

(a) Any person who intentionally harasses the child or ward of any other person because of that person’s employment shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Child” and “ward” mean a person under 16 years of age.

(2) “Harasses” means knowing and willful conduct directed at a specific child or ward that seriously alarms, annoys,
 torments, or terrorizes the child or ward, and that serves no legitimate purpose, including, but not limited to, that conduct occurring during the course of any actual or attempted recording of the child’s or ward’s image or voice, or both, without the express consent of the parent or legal guardian of the child or ward, by following the child’s or ward’s activities or by lying in wait. The conduct must be such as would cause a reasonable child to suffer substantial emotional distress, and actually cause the victim to suffer substantial emotional distress.

(3) “Employment” means the job, vocation, occupation, or profession of the parent or legal guardian of the
 child or ward.

(c) A second conviction under this section shall be punished by a fine not exceeding twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) and by imprisonment in a county jail for not less than five days but not exceeding one year. A third or subsequent conviction under this section shall be punished by a fine not exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) and by imprisonment in a county jail for not less than 30 days but not exceeding one year.

(d) Upon a violation of this section, the parent or legal guardian of an aggrieved child or ward may bring a civil action against the violator on behalf of the child or ward. The remedies in that
 civil action shall be limited to one or more of the following: actual damages, punitive damages, reasonable attorney’s fees, costs, disgorgement of any compensation from the sale, license, or dissemination of a child’s image or voice received by the individual who, in violation of this section, recorded the child’s image or voice, and injunctive relief against further violations of this section by the individual.

(e) The act of transmitting, publishing, or broadcasting a recording of the image or voice of a child does not constitute a violation of this section.

(f) This section does not preclude prosecution under any section of law that provides for greater punishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 348, Sec. 1.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.6. The Hertzberg-Alarcon California Prevention of Terrorism Act [11415. - 11419.]

11415.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Hertzberg-Alarcon California Prevention of Terrorism Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11416.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the threat of terrorism involving weapons of mass destruction, including, but not limited to, chemical, biological, nuclear, or radiological agents, is a significant public safety concern. The Legislature also recognizes that terrorism involving weapons of mass destruction could result in an intentional disaster placing residents of California in great peril. The Legislature also finds it necessary to sanction the possession, manufacture, use, or threatened use of chemical, biological, nuclear, or radiological weapons, as well as the intentional use or threatened use of industrial or commercial chemicals as weapons against persons or animals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11417.

(a) For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Weapon of mass destruction” includes chemical warfare agents, weaponized biological or biologic warfare agents, restricted biological agents, nuclear agents, radiological agents, or the intentional release of industrial agents as a weapon, or an aircraft, vessel, or vehicle, as described in Section 34500 of the Vehicle Code, which is used as a destructive weapon.

(2) “Chemical Warfare Agents” includes, but is not limited to, the following weaponized agents, or any analog of these agents:

(A) Nerve agents, including Tabun (GA), Sarin (GB), Soman (GD), GF, and VX.

(B) Choking agents, including Phosgene (CG) and Diphosgene (DP).

(C) Blood agents, including Hydrogen Cyanide (AC), Cyanogen Chloride (CK), and Arsine (SA).

(D) Blister agents, including mustards (H, HD [sulfur mustard], HN-1, HN-2, HN-3 [nitrogen mustard]), arsenicals, such as Lewisite (L), urticants, such as CX; and incapacitating agents, such as BZ.

(3) “Weaponized biological or biologic warfare agents” include weaponized pathogens, such as bacteria, viruses, rickettsia, yeasts, fungi, or genetically engineered pathogens, toxins, vectors, and endogenous biological regulators (EBRs).

(4) “Nuclear or radiological agents” includes any improvised nuclear device (IND) which is any explosive device designed to cause a nuclear yield; any radiological dispersal device (RDD) which is any explosive device utilized to spread radioactive material; or a simple radiological dispersal device (SRDD) which is any act or container designed to release radiological material as a weapon without an explosion.

(5) “Vector” means a living organism or a molecule, including a recombinant molecule, or a biological product that may be engineered as a result of biotechnology, that is capable of carrying a biological agent or toxin to a host.

(6) “Weaponization” is the deliberate processing, preparation, packaging, or synthesis of any substance for use as a weapon or munition. “Weaponized agents” are those agents or substances prepared for dissemination through any explosive, thermal, pneumatic, or mechanical means.

(7) For purposes of this section, “used as a destructive weapon” means to use with the intent of causing widespread great bodily injury or death by causing a fire or explosion or the release of a chemical, biological, or radioactive agent.

(b) The intentional release of a dangerous chemical or hazardous material generally utilized in an industrial or commercial process shall be considered use of a weapon of mass destruction when a person knowingly utilizes those agents with the intent to cause harm and the use places persons or animals at risk of serious injury, illness, or death, or endangers the environment.

(c) The lawful use of chemicals for legitimate mineral extraction, industrial, agricultural, or commercial purposes is not proscribed by this article.

(d) No university, research institution, private company, individual, or hospital engaged in scientific or public health research and, as required, registered with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) pursuant to Part 113 (commencing with Section 113.1) of Subchapter E of Chapter 1 of Title 9 or pursuant to Part 72 (commencing with Section 72.1) of Subchapter E of Chapter 1 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or any successor provisions, shall be subject to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 611, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11418.

(a) (1) Any person, without lawful authority, who possesses, develops, manufactures, produces, transfers, acquires, or retains any weapon of mass destruction, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 4, 8, or 12 years.

(2) Any person who commits a violation of paragraph (1) and who has been previously convicted of Section 11411, 11412, 11413, 11418, 11418.1, 11418.5, 11419, 11460, 18715, 18725, or 18740 shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 5, 10, or 15 years.

(b) (1) Any person who uses or directly employs against another person a weapon of mass destruction in a form that may cause widespread, disabling illness or injury in human beings shall be punished by imprisonment in the state
 prison for life.

(2) Any person who uses or directly employs against another person a weapon of mass destruction in a form that may cause widespread great bodily injury or death and causes the death of any human being shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for life without the possibility of parole. Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent punishment instead under Section 190.2.

(3) Any person who uses a weapon of mass destruction in a form that may cause widespread damage to or disruption of the food supply or “source of drinking water” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 25249.11 of the Health and Safety Code shall be punished by imprisonment
 in the state prison for 5, 8, or 12 years and by a fine of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(4) Any person who maliciously uses against animals, crops, or seed and seed stock, a weapon of mass destruction in a form that may cause widespread damage to or substantial diminution in the value of stock animals or crops, including seeds used for crops or product of the crops, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for 4, 8, or 12 years and by a fine of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(c) Any person who uses a weapon of mass destruction in a form that may cause widespread and significant damage to public natural resources,
 including coastal waterways and beaches, public parkland, surface waters, ground water, and wildlife, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for three, four, or six years.

(d) (1) Any person who uses recombinant technology or any other biological advance to create new pathogens or more virulent forms of existing pathogens for use in any crime described in subdivision (b) shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for 4, 8, or 12 years and by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(2) Any person who uses recombinant technology or any other biological advance to create new pathogens or more virulent forms of existing pathogens for use in any crime described in subdivision (c) shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for three, six, or nine years and by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent punishment instead pursuant to any other provision of law
 that imposes a greater or more severe punishment.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 500) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 55.   (AB 117)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Amending action (succeeding amendment by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178) operative October 1, 2011, pursuant to Secs. 68 and 69 of Ch. 39.    Amended version operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

11418.1.

Any person who gives, mails, sends, or causes to be sent any false or facsimile of a weapon of mass destruction to another person, or places, causes to be placed, or possesses any false or facsimile of a weapon of mass destruction, with the intent to cause another person to fear for his or her own safety, or for the personal safety of others, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If the person’s conduct causes another person to be placed in sustained fear, the person shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years and by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). For purposes of this section, “sustained fear” has the same meaning as in Section 11418.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 606, Sec. 6.   Effective September 17, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11418.5.

(a) Any person who knowingly threatens to use a weapon of mass destruction, with the specific intent that the statement as defined in Section 225 of the Evidence Code or a statement made by means of an electronic communication device, is to be taken as a threat, even if there is no intent of actually carrying it out, which, on its face and under the circumstances in which it is made, is so unequivocal, immediate, and specific as to convey to the person threatened, a gravity of purpose and an immediate prospect of execution of the threat, and thereby causes that person reasonably to be in sustained fear for his or her own safety, or for his or her immediate family’s safety shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for up to one year or in the state prison for 3, 4, or 6 years, and by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(b) For the purposes of this section, “sustained fear” can be established by, but is not limited to, conduct such as evacuation of any building by any occupant, evacuation of any school by any employee or student, evacuation of any home by any resident or occupant, any isolation, quarantine, or decontamination effort.

(c) The fact that the person who allegedly violated this section did not actually possess a biological agent, toxin, or chemical weapon does not constitute a defense to the crime specified in this section.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent punishment instead pursuant to any other provision of law that imposes a greater or more severe punishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 611, Sec. 2.   Effective September 17, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11419.

(a) Any person or entity possessing any of the restricted biological agents enumerated in subdivision (b) shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 4, 8, or 12 years, and by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(b) For the purposes of this section, “restricted biological agents” means the following:

(1) Viruses: Crimean-Congo hemorrhagic fever virus, eastern equine encephalitis virus, ebola viruses, equine morbilli virus, lassa fever virus, marburg virus, Rift Valley fever virus, South African hemorrhagic fever viruses (Junin, Machupo, Sabia,
 Flexal, Guanarito), tick-borne encephalitis complex viruses, variola major virus (smallpox virus), Venezuelan equine encephalitis virus, viruses causing hantavirus pulmonary syndrome, yellow fever virus.

(2) Bacteria: bacillus anthracis (commonly known as anthrax), brucella abortus, brucella melitensis, brucella suis, burkholderia (pseudomonas) mallei, burkholderia (pseudomonas) pseudomallei, clostridium botulinum, francisella tularensis, yersinia pestis (commonly known as plague).

(3) Rickettsiae: coxiella burnetii, rickettsia prowazekii, rickettsia rickettsii.

(4) Fungi: coccidioides immitis.

(5) Toxins: abrin, aflatoxins, botulinum toxins, clostridium perfringens epsilon toxin, conotoxins, diacetoxyscirpenol, ricin, saxitoxin, shigatoxin,
 staphylococcal enterotoxins, tabtoxin, tetrodotoxin, T-2 toxin.

(6) Any other microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or biological product that has the same characteristics as, or is substantially similar to, the substances prohibited in this section.

(c) (1) This section shall not apply to any physician, veterinarian, pharmacist, or licensed medical practitioner authorized to dispense a prescription under Section 11026 of the Health and Safety Code, or universities, research institutions, or pharmaceutical corporations, or any person possessing the agents pursuant to a lawful prescription issued by a person defined in Section 11026 of the Health and Safety Code, if the person possesses vaccine strains of the viral agents Junin virus strain #1, Rift Valley fever virus strain MP-12, Venezuelan equine encephalitis virus strain TC-83 and yellow fever virus
 strain 17-D; any vaccine strain described in Section 78.1 of Subpart A of Part 78 of Subchapter C of Chapter 1 of Title 9 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or any successor provisions, and any toxin for medical use, inactivated for use as vaccines, or toxin preparation for biomedical research use at a median lethal dose for vertebrates of more than 100 ng/kg, as well as any national standard toxin required for biologic potency testing as described in Part 113 (commencing with Section 113.1) of Subchapter E of Chapter 1 of Title 9 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or any successor provisions.

(2) For the purposes of this section, no person shall be deemed to be in possession of an agent if the person is naturally exposed to, or innocently infected or contaminated with, the agent.

(d) Any peace officer who encounters any of the restricted agents mentioned above shall immediately
 notify and consult with a local public health officer to ensure proper consideration of any public health risk.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent punishment instead pursuant to any other provision of law that imposes a greater or more severe punishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 501.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Paramilitary Organizations [11460. - 11460.]

11460.

(a) Any two or more persons who assemble as a paramilitary organization for the purpose of practicing with weapons shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

As used in this subdivision, “paramilitary organization” means an organization which is not an agency of the United States government or of the State of California, or which is not a private school meeting the requirements set forth in Section 48222 of the Education Code, but which engages in instruction or training in guerrilla warfare or sabotage, or which, as an organization, engages in rioting or the violent
 disruption of, or the violent interference with, school activities.

(b) (1) Any person who teaches or demonstrates to any other person the use, application, or making of any firearm, explosive, or destructive device, or technique capable of causing injury or death to persons, knowing or having reason to know or intending that these objects or techniques will be unlawfully employed for use in, or in the furtherance of a civil disorder, or any person who assembles with one or more other persons for the purpose of training with, practicing with, or being instructed in the use of any firearm, explosive, or destructive device, or technique capable of causing injury or death to persons, with the intent to cause or further a civil disorder, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

Nothing in this subdivision shall make unlawful any act of any peace officer or a member of the military forces of this state or of the United States, performed in the lawful course of his or her official duties.

(2) As used in this section:

(A) “Civil disorder” means any disturbance involving acts of violence which cause an immediate danger of or results in damage or injury to the property or person of any other individual.

(B) “Destructive device” has the same meaning as in Section 16460.

(C) “Explosive” has the same meaning as in Section 12000 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) “Firearm” means any device designed to be used as a weapon, or which
 may readily be converted to a weapon, from which is expelled a projectile by the force of any explosion or other form of combustion, or the frame or receiver of this weapon.

(E) “Peace officer” means any peace officer or other officer having the powers of arrest of a peace officer, specified in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 93.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Interruption of Communication [11470. - 11482.]

11470.

For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Communication service” means any communication service that interconnects with the public switched telephone network and is required by the Federal Communications Commission to provide customers with 911 access to emergency services.

(b) “Government entity” means every local government, including a city, county, city and county, a transit, joint powers, special, or other district, the state, and every agency, department, commission, board, bureau, or other political subdivision of the state, or any authorized agent thereof.

(c) “Interrupt communication service” means to knowingly or intentionally suspend, disconnect, interrupt, or disrupt a communication service to one or more particular customers or all customers in a geographical area.

(d) “Judicial officer” means a magistrate, judge, commissioner, referee, or any person appointed by a court to serve in one of these capacities, of a superior court.

(e) “Service provider” means a person or entity, including a government entity, that offers a communication service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11471.

(a) Except as authorized by this article, no government entity, and no service provider acting at the request of a government entity, shall interrupt a communication service for either of the following purposes:

(1) To prevent the communication service from being used for an illegal purpose.

(2) To protect public health, safety, or welfare.

(b) A government entity may interrupt a communication service for a purpose stated in subdivision (a) in any of the following circumstances:

(1) The interruption is authorized by a court order pursuant to Section 11473.

(2) The government entity reasonably determines that (A) the interruption is required to address an extreme emergency situation that involves immediate danger of death or great bodily injury, (B) there is insufficient time, with due diligence, to first obtain a court order under Section 11473, and (C) the interruption meets the grounds for issuance of a court order under Section 11473. A government entity acting pursuant to this paragraph shall comply with Section 11475.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 591, 631, or 632, or Section 7906 of the Public Utilities Code, a supervising law enforcement official with jurisdiction may require that a service provider interrupt a communication service that
 is available to a person if (A) the law enforcement official has probable cause to believe that the person is holding hostages and is committing a crime, or is barricaded and is resisting apprehension through the use or threatened use of force, and (B) the purpose of the interruption is to prevent the person from communicating with anyone other than a peace officer or a person authorized by a peace officer. This paragraph does not authorize the interruption of communication service to a wireless device other than a wireless device used or available for use by the person or persons involved in a hostage or barricade situation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11472.

(a) An application by a government entity for a court order authorizing the interruption of a communication service shall be made in writing upon the personal oath or affirmation of the chief executive of the government entity or his or her designee, to the presiding judge of the superior court or a judicial officer designated by the presiding judge for that purpose.

(b) Each application shall include all of the following information:

(1) The identity of the government entity making the application.

(2) A statement attesting to a review of the
 application and the circumstances in support of the application by the chief executive officer of the government entity making the application, or his or her designee. This statement shall state the name and office of the person who effected this review.

(3) A full and complete statement of the facts and circumstances relied on by the government entity to justify a reasonable belief that the order should be issued, including the facts and circumstances that support the statements made in paragraphs (4) to (7), inclusive.

(4) A statement that probable cause exists to believe that the communication service to be interrupted is being used or will be used for an unlawful purpose or to assist in a violation of the law. The statement shall expressly identify the unlawful purpose or violation
 of the law.

(5) A statement that immediate and summary action is needed to avoid serious, direct, and immediate danger to public health, safety, or welfare.

(6) A statement that the proposed interruption is narrowly tailored to the specific circumstances under which the order is made and would not interfere with more communication than is necessary to achieve the purposes of the order.

(7) A statement that the proposed interruption would leave open ample alternative means of communication.

(8) A statement that the government entity has considered the practical disadvantages of the proposed interruption, including any disruption of emergency communication
 service.

(9) A description of the scope and duration of the proposed interruption. The application shall clearly describe the specific communication service to be interrupted with sufficient detail as
 to customer, cell sector, central office, or geographical area affected.

(c) The judicial officer may require the applicant to furnish additional testimony or documentary evidence in support of an application for an order under this section.

(d) The judicial officer shall accept a facsimile copy of the signature of any person required to give a personal oath or affirmation pursuant to subdivision (a) as an original signature to the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11473.

Upon application made under Section 11472, the judicial officer may enter an ex parte order, as requested or modified, authorizing interruption of a communication service in the territorial jurisdiction in which the judicial officer is sitting, if the judicial officer determines, on the basis of the facts submitted by the applicant, that all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) There is probable cause that the communication service is being or will be used for an unlawful purpose or to assist in a violation of the law.

(b) Absent immediate and summary action to interrupt the communication service, serious, direct,
 and immediate danger to public health, safety, or welfare will result.

(c) The interruption of communication service is narrowly tailored to prevent unlawful infringement of speech that is protected by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution, or a violation of any other rights under federal or state law.

(d) The interruption of a communication service would leave open ample alternative means of communication.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11474.

An order authorizing an interruption of a communication service shall include all of the following:

(a) A statement of the court’s findings required by Section 11473.

(b) A clear description of the communication service to be interrupted, with specific detail as to the affected service, service provider, and customer or geographical area.

(c) A statement of the period of time during which the
 interruption is authorized. The order may provide for a fixed duration or require that the government end the interruption when it determines that the interruption is no longer reasonably necessary because the danger that justified the interruption has abated. If the judicial officer finds that probable cause exists that a particular communication service is being used or will be used as part of a continuing criminal enterprise, the court may order the permanent termination of that service and require that the terminated service not be referred to another communication service.

(d) A requirement that the government entity immediately serve notice on the service provider when the interruption is to cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11475.

A government entity that interrupts a communication service pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 11471 shall take all of the following steps:

(a) Apply for a court order under Section 11472 without delay. If possible, the application shall be filed within six hours after commencement of the interruption. If that is not possible, the application shall be filed at the first reasonably available opportunity, but in no event later than 24 hours after commencement of an interruption of a communication service. If an application is filed more than six hours after commencement of an interruption of a communication service, the application shall include a declaration, made
 under penalty of perjury, stating the reason for the delay.

(b) Prepare a signed statement of intent to apply for a court order. The statement of intent shall clearly describe the extreme emergency situation and the specific communication service to be interrupted. If a government entity does not apply for a court order within six hours, the government entity shall submit a copy of the signed statement of intent to the court within six hours.

(c) Provide conspicuous notice of the application for a court order on the government entity’s Internet Web site without delay, unless the circumstances that justify an interruption of a communication service without first obtaining a court order also justify not providing the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11476.

(a) If an order issued pursuant to Section 11473 or a signed statement of intent prepared pursuant to Section 11475 would authorize the interruption of a communication service for all customers of the interrupted communication service within a geographical area, the government entity shall serve the order or statement on the Governor’s Office of Emergency Services.

(b) The Governor’s Office of Emergency Services shall have policy discretion on whether to request that the federal government authorize and effect the proposed interruption.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11477.

If an order issued pursuant to Section 11473 or a signed statement of intent prepared pursuant to Section 11475 is not governed by Section 11476, the government entity shall serve the order or statement on both of the following persons:

(a) The appropriate service provider’s contact for receiving requests from law enforcement, including receipt of state or federal warrants, orders, or subpoenas.

(b) The affected customer, if the identity of the customer is known. When serving an affected customer, the government entity shall provide notice of the opportunity for judicial review under Section
 11479.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11478.

(a) Good faith reliance by a service provider on a court order issued pursuant to Section 11473, a signed statement of intent prepared pursuant to Section 11475, or the instruction of a supervising law enforcement officer acting pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11471 shall constitute a complete defense for the service provider against any action brought as a result of the interruption of a communication service authorized by that court order, statement of intent, or instruction.

(b) A communications service provider shall designate a security employee and an alternate security employee, to provide all required assistance to law enforcement officials to
 carry out the purposes of this article.

(c) A service provider that intentionally interrupts communication service pursuant to this article shall comply with any rule or notification requirement of the Public Utilities Commission or Federal Communications Commission, or both, and any other applicable provision or requirement of state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11479.

(a) A person whose communication service has been interrupted pursuant to this article may petition the superior court to contest the grounds for the interruption and restore the interrupted service.

(b) The remedy provided in this section is not exclusive. Other laws may provide a remedy for a person who is aggrieved by an interruption of a communication service authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11480.

The Legislature finds and declares that ensuring that California users of any communication service not have that service interrupted, and thereby be deprived of 911 access to emergency services or a means to engage in constitutionally protected expression, is a matter of statewide concern and not a municipal affair, as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11481.

(a) This article does not apply to any of the following actions:

(1) The interruption of a communication service with the consent of the affected customer.

(2) The interruption of a communication service pursuant to a customer service agreement, contract, or tariff.

(3) The interruption of a communication service to protect the security of the communication network or other computing resources of a government entity or service provider.

(4) The interruption of a communication service